FST/ckt/ckt_verbs.foma
# Define Alphabets
define Alphabets [ А | Б | В | Г | Д | Е | Ё | Ж | З | И | Й | К | Ӄ | Л | Ԓ | М | Н | Ӈ | О | П | Р | С | Т | У | Ф | Х | Ц | Ч | Ш | Щ | Ъ | Ы | Ь | Э | Ю | Я
                 | а | б | в | г | д | e | ё | ж | з | и | й | к | ӄ | л | ԓ | м | н | ӈ | о | п | р | с | т | у | ф | х | ц | ч | ш | щ | ъ | ы | ь | э | ю | я | ʼ ];

# Define Vowels
define Vow [ А | Е | Ё | И | О | У | Ы | Э | Ю | Я | %{Æ%}|
             а | е | ё | и | о | у | ы | э | ю | я ];

# Define dominant vowels
define Vd [ А | О | Я | Ё | 
            а | о | я | ё ];

# Define recessive vowels
define Vr [ и | у | э | i | u | e ];

# Define Yots 
define Yot [ Е | е | Ё | ё | Ю | ю | Я | я ];

# Define Consonants 
define Cns [ Б | В | Г | Д | Ж | З | Й | К | Ӄ | Л | Ԓ | М | Н | Ӈ | П | Р | С | Т | Ф | Х | Ц | Ч | Ш | Щ |
             б | в | г | д | ж | з | й | к | ӄ | л | ԓ | м | н | ӈ | п | р | с | т | ф | х | ц | ч | ш | щ ];

# Define Coronals
define Coronals [ т | н | й | ч | р | ԓ |
                 Т | Н | Й | Ч | Р | Ԓ ];

# Define Glottals
define Glottals [ ʼ | Ъ | Ь | ъ | ь ];

# Define Nasals
define Nasals [ М | Н | Ӈ |
	       м | н | ӈ ];

# Define Anteriors
define Anteriors [ П | Т | С | Ч | М | Н | В |
                  п | т | с | ч | м | н | в ];

# Define Alveolars 
define Alveolars [ Т | Н | Р | С | Ч | Ԓ | Л |
                   т | н | р | с | ч | ԓ | л ];


# Define Bilabials
define Bilabials [ П | М | В |
                   п | м | в ] ;

# Define Backs  
define Backs [ К | Ӄ | Ӈ | Г |
	      к | ӄ | ӈ | г ];

lexc ckt_verbs.lexc
define Lexicon;

# Define Elision
define Elision н -> 0 || _ "^" к ,,
               ы к -> 0 || _ "^" ԓ е н ,,
	       ы к -> 0 || _ "^" ԓ и н ,,
               и к -> к || _ "^" ԓ и н ,,
                 к -> 0 || _ "^" ӈ ы н;

# Define Pronoun alternation
define Proalt ы м ы м -> 0 || _ "^" о ,,
              о -> г ы м || ы м ы м "^" _;

# Define Suffix Anim
#define SuffixAnim к -> 0 || _ "^" т и н э;

# Define Prefixation
define PrefixP [..] -> м ы || .#. _ р Vd;

define PrefixC [..] -> м ы т р а || .#. _ ?* ӈ ы н .#.;

define BuffA  A -> э || _ Cns+ [ э | н ] ,,
              A -> а || _ Cns+ [ а | н ];

define Prefixu [..] -> г э || .#. _ ?* ԓ и н .#.; 

define PrefixF [..] -> т || .#. _ ?* г ъ э к .#.;

# Define Suffixation
define SuffixIND к -> 0 || _ "^" н и н;

define Insert ы к -> 0 || ԓ _ "^" н и н;

define Assert ы к -> 0 || в _ "^" н и н;

define Opport к -> 0 || _ "^" г ъ э н;

define Sellt н -> 0 || _ "^" к;

#Define k Deletion
define KDeletion ы к -> 0 || _ "^" г ъ э к;

define Kretention [..] -> ы || ӈ _ "^" ԓ и н;

define PreSufix [..] -> м ы || .#. _ ?* г ъ э н .#.;

define PreSufixComb [..] -> т ы ԓ || .#. _ ?* ӈ ӈ о н а т .#.;

define KElision к -> 0 || _ "^" ӈ ӈ о н а т;

define SufixHt [..] -> м ы т || .#. _ ?* н э т .#.;
                 
define MoreKelisions к -> 0 || _ "^" н э т;

define Ind к -> р к ы н и н || _ "$" ;

define IndPst к -> н э н а т || _ "/" ;


# Cleanup: remove morpheme boundaries
define Cleanup ["^"|"$"|"/"] -> 0;

read lexc ckt_verbs.lexc
define Lexicon

define Grammar Lexicon       .o.
	       Elision       .o.
           Proalt        .o.
	       PrefixP       .o.
	       PrefixC       .o.
	       BuffA         .o.
	       Prefixu       .o.
	       PrefixF       .o.
 	       SuffixIND     .o.
	       KDeletion     .o.
	       Kretention    .o.
	       PreSufix      .o.
	       PreSufixComb  .o.
	       KElision      .o.
	       SufixHt       .o.
	       MoreKelisions .o.
		   Insert        .o.
		   Assert        .o.
		   Opport        .o.
		   Sellt         .o.
		   Ind 					 .o.	
		   IndPst				 .o.	
	       Cleanup;   

regex Grammar;
